Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.191

Director—Educational conferences—Examinations.

The director shall have the authority to hold educational conferences for the benefit of the industry and shall conduct examinations for licenses as an escrow officer.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 15; 1971 ex.s. c 245 s 12. Formerly RCW 18.44.250.]